Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2445.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 9, chapter 4, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 9-500.54, to read: START_STATUTE9-500.54. Task order contracts; posting; redaction; exceptions; definition A. A city or town that enters into a task order contract with a contractor in this state shall conspicuously post the contract on the city's or town's website. B. A contractor that enters into a task order contract with a city or town may redact any personal or proprietary information from the contract before the contract is posted on the city's or town's website pursuant to subsection A of this section. C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, the following may not be redacted: 1. The total dollar amount of the contract. 2. The identity of the contractor. 3. A description of the services that will be performed under the contract. 4. The length of the contract. D. For the purposes of this section, "task order contract" means an indefinite delivery or indefinite quantity contract for supplies or services that provides for the issuance of a task order for services or supplies during the contractual period. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 11, chapter 2, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-269.31, to read: START_STATUTE11-269.31. Task order contracts; posting; redaction; exceptions; definition A. A county that enters into a task order contract with a contractor in this state shall conspicuously post the contract on the county's website. B. A contractor that enters into a task order contract with a county may redact any personal or proprietary information from the contract before the contract is posted on the county's website pursuant to subsection A of this section. C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, the following may not be redacted: 1. The total dollar amount of the contract. 2. The identity of the contractor. 3. A description of the services that will be performed under the contract. 4. The length of the contract. D. For the purposes of this section, "task order contract" means an indefinite delivery or indefinite quantity contract for supplies or services that provides for the issuance of a task order for services or supplies during the contractual period. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 15, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-120.08, to read: START_STATUTE15-120.08. Task order contracts; posting; redaction; exceptions; definition A. A school district that enters into a task order contract with a contractor in this state shall conspicuously post the contract on the school district's website. B. A contractor that enters into a task order contract with a school district may redact any personal or proprietary information from the contract before the contract is posted on the school district's website pursuant to subsection A of this section. C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, the following may not be redacted: 1. The total dollar amount of the contract. 2. The identity of the contractor. 3. A description of the services that will be performed under the contract. 4. The length of the contract. D. For the purposes of this section, "task order contract" means an indefinite delivery or indefinite quantity contract for supplies or services that provides for the issuance of a task order for services or supplies during the contractual period. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Title 41, chapter 23, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-2505, to read: START_STATUTE41-2505. Task order contracts; posting; redaction; exceptions; definition A. A state governmental unit that enters into a task order contract with a contractor in this state shall conspicuously post the contract on the state governmental unit's website. B. A contractor that enters into a task order contract with a state governmental unit may redact any personal or proprietary information from the contract before the contract is posted on the state governmental unit's website pursuant to subsection A of this section. C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, the following may not be redacted: 1. The total dollar amount of the contract. 2. The identity of the contractor. 3. A description of the services that will be performed under the contract. 4. The length of the contract. D. For the purposes of this section, "task order contract" means an indefinite delivery or indefinite quantity contract for supplies or services that provides for the issuance of a task order for services or supplies during the contractual period. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Short title This act shall be known and cited as the "Government Transparency Act".